Utah statutes.
76-6-402.5.   Defense regarding metal dealers.

It is a defense against a charge of theft under this part and a defense against a civil claim for conversion if any dealer as defined in Section 76-10-901 has acted in compliance with Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 9, Regulation of Metal Dealers.

